District of Columbia statutes.
24-407

Repeal of inconsistent laws; savings provision.

All acts or parts of acts inconsistent with the provisions of §§ 22-2601, 24-401 [repealed], 24-402 [repealed], 24-403 to 24-409, and 24-201.26 are hereby repealed; provided, however, that for any felony committed before July 15, 1932, the penalty, sentence, or forfeiture provided by law for such felony at the time such felony was committed shall remain in full force and effect and shall be imposed, notwithstanding said sections.

July 15, 1932, 47 Stat. 698, ch. 492, § 7
1981 Ed., § 24-207.
1973 Ed., § 24-207.
Sections 24-401 and 24-402, referred to in this section, were repealed by the Act of July 17, 1947, 61 Stat. 379, ch. 263, § 7.